California, session 20252026, SB714.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation that would establish a zero-emission vehicle workforce development pilot project at one or two community colleges to develop a model curriculum for training zero-emission vehicle workforce technicians, and would establish a Clean Energy Workforce Training Council to conduct an economic analysis on workforce development needs, infrastructure needs, and other needs for hydrogen and other clean energy technologies.